Arkansas, session 2025, SB612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 88, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
SUBCHAPTER 15 — REGULATION OF SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS

4-88-1501. Definitions.
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Immediate connection" means the:
(i) Final link in the chain of the content’s supply;
(ii) Application on which the content is viewed; or
(iii) Service or website on which the content is
*LJH246*
04-14-2025 09:19:36 LJH246

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 SB612
viewed.
(B) "Immediate connection" does not include the:
(i) Content creator, unless the content creator
hosts his, her, or its own social media platform for sharing that content and
the social media platform allows for interaction with the content creator or
other viewers of the content;
(ii) Physical device that displays the content;
(iii) Network provider that electronically transmits
the content; or
(iv) Enterprise that stores or hosts the content,
unless that enterprise is owned or operated by the social media platform;
(2) "Minor" means an individual under sixteen (16) years of age;
(3) "Promoting" means placing content on the feed, screen,
account, or other digital medium of the minor that causes the minor to view
the content without explicitly searching for that specific content and
includes algorithmic promotion of the content based on a previous search or
engagement;
(4) "Significant bodily or cognitive harm" means the impairment
of physical condition or the infliction of substantial pain or substantial
bruising, swelling, or visible marks associated with a trauma injury that
impedes typical function of the body or brain and results from a person's
attempt to end his or her own life or gravely injure himself or herself; and
(5) “Social media platform” means a business entity or
organization that operates an online platform, application, or service that:
(A) Is designed to facilitate user-to-user, user-to-group,
or user-to-public interaction, expression, or communication;
(B) Assigns, utilizes, or relies on a unique identifier,
username, profile name, or image that is associated with a specific user
account;
(C) Provides mechanisms for a user to create an online
profile comprised of personally identifiable information or professional
information, including without limitation a user's name, username, address,
date of birth, educational pedigree, professional details, interests,
activities, or connections;
(D) Employs features that allow a user to connect, follow,
or establish a relationship with other users and creates a network of
04-14-2025 09:19:36 LJH246

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 SB612
interactions either in real time or asynchronously, including without
limitation virtual likes and dislikes;
(E) Generates revenue primarily through user engagement,
including without limitation through advertising, user data monetization, or
premium content; and
(F) Is accessed by Arkansas users.
4-88-1502. Prohibited activity by social media platform.
(a) A social media platform shall not use a design, algorithm, or
feature that the social media platform knows, or should have known through
the exercise of reasonable care, causes a user to:
(1) Purchase a controlled substance;
(2) Develop an eating disorder;
(3) Commit or attempt to commit suicide; or
(4) Develop or sustain an addiction to the social media
platform.
(b) Excluding subdivision (a)(3) of this section, a social media
platform does not violate this section if it demonstrates that it corrected
any design, algorithm, or feature that the social media platform discovers
presents more than a de minimis risk of the items listed in subsection (a) of
this section within thirty (30) days of that discovery.

4-88-1503. Liability of social media platform.
(a) A social media platform that knowingly and willfully violates this
section is liable under this subsection (a) for:
(1) A civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
per violation; and
(2) An award of litigation costs and reasonable attorney’s fees
in an action brought under this subsection (a).
(b)(1) A parent or guardian whose minor child or legal dependent
commits suicide or attempts to commit suicide that results in significant
bodily or cognitive harm following exposure to online content promoting, or
otherwise advancing, self-harm or suicide may bring a civil action against
the social media platform that hosted, promoted, shared, or otherwise
facilitated the immediate connection between the victim and the content.
(2) A court may award the following under this subsection (b):
(A) Affirmative relief from the effects of the content;
04-14-2025 09:19:36 LJH246

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 SB612
(B) Damages;
(C) Costs of medical treatment;
(D) Funeral expenses and related costs;
(E) Punitive damages;
(F) Litigation costs; and
(G) Reasonable attorney's fees.
(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees under subdivision (b)(2)(G) shall
be no less than the lesser of the:
(A) Total cost of the defendant’s legal fees for the
lawsuit; or
(B) Reasonable legal fees for the defense, had the
defendant prevailed.
(c) An action to enforce a cause of action under this section shall be
commenced within four (4) years after the cause of action accrued.
(d) This section does not impose liability on a social media platform
for:
(1) Displaying content that is created and hosted entirely by a
third party, including without limitation an advertisement managed by a third
party and shared on the social media platform; or
(2) Conduct that is protected by the:
(A) First Amendment of the United States Constitution; or
(B) Arkansas Constitution.

/s/Dees












04-14-2025 09:19:36 LJH246